District of Columbia statutes.
23-556

Relation to Federal law on wire interception and interception of oral communications.

(a)

Sections 23-542, 23-543, 23-545 [repealed], 23-553, 23-554, and 23-555 of this subchapter shall be construed to supplement, and not to supersede or otherwise limit, the provisions of chapter 119 of Title 18, United States Code (relating to wire interception and interception of oral communications).

(b)

Sections 23-546, 23-547, 23-548, 23-549, 23-550, 23-551, and 23-552 of this subchapter shall be construed not to supersede or otherwise limit the provisions of chapter 119 of Title 18, United States Code, except in cases of irreconcilable conflict.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 627, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
Section 23-545, referred to in subsection (a) of this section, was repealed by the Act of October 15, 1970, 84 Stat. 931, Pub. L. 91-452, § 252.
1973 Ed., § 23-556.
1981 Ed., § 23-556.